Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 3
COMPLIANCE WITH LOCAL, STATE,
AND FEDERAL REGULATIONS

29-27-301. General operating limitations.

A local government that provides cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service under this article shall comply with all state and federal laws, rules, and regulations governing provision of such service by a private provider; except that nothing herein shall be construed to affect the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission with respect to municipal utilities.

A local government shall not make or grant any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to itself or to any private provider of cable television services, telecommunications services, or advanced services.

A local government shall apply without discrimination as to itself and to any private provider the local government's ordinances, rules, and policies, including those relating to:

Obligation to serve;

Access to public rights-of-way;

Permitting;

Performance bonding where an entity other than the local government is performing the work;

Reporting; and

Quality of service.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1283, § 1, effective June 3.

29-27-302. Scope of article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize any local government to:

Provide, directly or indirectly, cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service; or

Purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or operate a facility for the purpose of providing, directly or indirectly, cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a local government purchasing, leasing, constructing, maintaining, or operating facilities that are designed to provide cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service that the local government uses for internal or intergovernmental purposes.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to the sale or lease by a local government to private providers of excess capacity, if:

Such excess capacity is insubstantial in relation to the capacity utilized by the local government for its own purposes; and

The opportunity to purchase and the opportunity to use such excess capacity is made available to any private provider in a nondiscriminatory, nonexclusive, and competitively neutral manner.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit either the authority of the statewide internet portal authority created in section 24-37.7-102, C.R.S., to carry out its mission or to integrate the electronic information delivery systems of local governments into the statewide internet portal as defined in article 37.7 of title 24, C.R.S.

Nothing in part 1 or part 2 of this article 27 shall be construed to apply to a school district or board of cooperative services, created pursuant to article 5 of title 22, purchasing, leasing, constructing, maintaining, or operating facilities that exclusively provide advanced service that enables students, teachers, and staff members of the district, the board of cooperative services, or the member districts of the board of cooperative services, to access a school-owned and operated network to facilitate remote learning.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1284, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2021:

(5) added, (HB 21-1114), ch. 151, p. 873, § 1, effective May 18.

29-27-303. Enforcement and appeal.

Before an individual subscriber or a private provider that competes with a local government in the geographic boundaries of the local government may file an action in district court for violation of this article, that person shall file a written complaint with the local government. The failure by the local government to issue a final decision regarding the complaint within forty-five days shall be treated as an adverse decision for purposes of appeal.

An appeal of an adverse decision from the local government may be taken to the district court for a de novo proceeding.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1284, § 1, effective June 3.

29-27-304. Applicability.

This article shall apply to cable television service, telecommunications service, and advanced service and to the purchase, lease, construction, maintenance, or operation of any facility for the purpose of providing such service, for which a local government has not entered into an agreement or otherwise taken any substantial action prior to March 1, 2005, to provide such service or purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or operate such facilities.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1284, § 1, effective June 3.